Massachusetts, session 194th, H3998.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after 
Section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:- 
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
commonwealth a separate fund, to be known as the Native Planting Fund. It shall consist of 
amounts credited to the fund in accordance with this section. The secretary of the Massachusetts 
Department of Transportation shall be the custodian of the fund. 
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized 
by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on 

of 4 9 money in the fund; (iii) state and federal grants for green infrastructure projects; and (iv) revenue 
generated from the sale of a dedicated vanity license plate featuring native pollinator imagery. 
Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money 
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund. 
(c) Money in the fund shall be expended to support the establishment and implementation 
of the program established in section 33 of chapter 81, including grants to municipalities and 
partnerships with environmental organizations. Priority funding shall be given to projects 
demonstrating significant community and environmental benefits in the commonwealth. 
(d) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall annually, not later than 
December 31, report on the activity of the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on 
environment and natural resources; (ii) chairs of the joint committee on transportation; (iii) house 
and senate committees on ways and means; and (iv) clerks of the house of representatives and 
senate. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 81 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 33. (a) The department shall establish a program to promote the cultivation and 
maintenance of native flowering plants, grasses and shrubs on land bordering along state 
highways and other public lands. The department shall establish objectives for the program 
including: (i) incorporating native plantings into green infrastructure solutions, such as rain 
gardens, bio-swales and permeable landscapes to reduce runoff, filter pollutants and improve 
water quality; (ii) establishing and enhancing habitats for pollinators, including bees, butterflies 
and other beneficial insects by prioritizing plant species native to the region; and (iii) utilizing 

of 4 31 native vegetation to improve soil health, sequester carbon and reduce the need for emissions-
intensive maintenance activities such as mowing and pesticide applications. 
(b) The department, in consultation with the department of agricultural resources, the 
department of environmental protection and relevant environmental organizations, shall: (i) 
identify and prioritize suitable locations and areas that would benefit from improved stormwater 
management, reduced maintenance or enhanced biodiversity; (ii) develop standards for selecting 
and maintaining plant species to ensure their ecological suitability, resilience and effectiveness in 
achieving the program’s goals; (iii) encourage the use of innovative stormwater management 
techniques that integrate native vegetation; and (iv) coordinate with municipalities, regional 
planning agencies and environmental groups to implement pilot projects and community-based 
initiatives. 
(c) The department shall to support the program’s implementation by establishing: (i) 
grants to municipalities for designing and installing green infrastructure projects utilizing native 
plantings; (ii) partnerships with local nurseries and landscapers to supply native plants and 
support job creation; (iii) public-private partnerships to reduce costs and enhance the program’s 
outreach; and (iv) in consultation with the registry of motor vehicles, a vanity license plate 
featuring native pollinator imagery, with the proceeds supporting the program’s activities and 
grants to municipalities. 
(d) The department shall promote community engagement and education by: (i) 
developing and disseminating educational materials about the environmental, economic and 
health benefits of native plantings and stormwater management; (ii) encouraging citizen 
involvement through volunteer programs, local workshops and monitoring initiatives; and (iii) 

of 4 53 collaborating with school and community organizations to promote environmental stewardship 
and awareness. 
(e) The department shall establish measurable goals and metrics to assess the program’s 
effectiveness, including: (i) the reduction in stormwater runoff and improvement in water 
quality; (ii) increases in pollinator populations and biodiversity; (iii) cost savings in maintenance 
and operations; and (iv) annual reporting to the general public and the legislature on the 
program’s progress. 
(f) The department shall, pursuant to chapter 30A, promulgate rules and regulations to 
carry out the purposes of this section within 1 year of its effective date.